Utah statutes.
17-41-303.   Review of proposal for creation of agriculture protection area
or industrial protection area.
(1)  After 15 days from the date of the notice, the applicable legislative
body shall refer the proposal and any objections and proposed modifications to
the proposal to the advisory committee and planning commission for their
review, comments, and recommendations.
(2) (a)  Within 45 days after receipt of the proposal, the planning commission
shall submit a written report to the applicable legislative body that:
(i)  analyzes and evaluates the effect of the creation of the proposed area on
the planning policies and objectives of the county or municipality, as the
case may be;
(ii)  analyzes and evaluates the proposal by applying the criteria contained
in Section 17-41-305;
(iii)  recommends any modifications to the land to be included in the proposed
agriculture protection area or industrial protection area;
(iv)  analyzes and evaluates any objections to the proposal; and
(v)  includes a recommendation to the applicable legislative body either to
accept, accept and modify, or reject the proposal.
(b)  Within 45 days after receipt of the proposal, the advisory board shall
submit a written report to the applicable legislative body that:
(i)  recommends any modifications to the land to be included in the proposed
agriculture protection area or industrial protection area;
(ii)  analyzes and evaluates the proposal by applying the criteria contained
in Section 17-41-305;
(iii)  analyzes and evaluates any objections to the proposal; and
(iv)  includes a recommendation to the applicable legislative body either to
accept, accept and modify, or reject the proposal.
(c)  The applicable legislative body shall consider a failure of the planning
commission or advisory committee to submit a written report within the 45 days
under Subsection (2)(a) or (b) as a recommendation of that committee to
approve the proposal as submitted.
